Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 13
ANHYDROUS AMMONIA

Section

35-13-101. Legislative declaration.

This is an article to prescribe uniform regulations in this state for safety in the design, construction, location, installation, and operation of equipment for storing, handling, transporting by tank or tank trailer, and utilizing anhydrous ammonia as an agricultural fertilizer; and to provide for the enjoining or abatement of violations of regulations issued under this article; and to prohibit the refilling or use of such containers without authorization by the owner thereof; and to prohibit the adoption by municipalities or other political subdivisions of ordinances or regulations in conflict with this article.

The general assembly hereby declares that any violation of this article or rules promulgated pursuant to this article shall constitute a substantial danger to public health and safety.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 325, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-17-1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 633, § 1, effective August 5.

35-13-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Anhydrous ammonia" means the compound formed by the combination of the two gaseous elements, nitrogen and hydrogen, in the proportion of one part nitrogen to three parts hydrogen by volume in compressed and liquefied form.

"Commissioner" means the commissioner of agriculture.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 325, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-17-2.

35-13-103. Commissioner to promulgate rules.

The commissioner shall, in addition to other relevant criteria, use as a guide to make, promulgate, and enforce rules setting forth minimum general safety standards covering the design, construction, location, installation, and operation of equipment for storage, handling, transportation by tank truck or tank trailer, and utilization of anhydrous ammonia fertilizer such standards as provided in American national standards institute standard K61.1-1999, or subsequent revisions thereof. Said rules shall be as are reasonably necessary for the protection of the safety of the public and persons using such materials and shall be in substantial conformity with the generally accepted standards of safety concerning the same subject matter. Such rules shall be adopted by the commissioner only after a public hearing thereon.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 325, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-17-3.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 1726, § 7, effective May 14.

Cross references:

For rule-making procedures, see article 4 of title 24.

35-13-104. Condition of equipment.

All equipment shall be installed and maintained in a safe operating condition and in conformity with the rules and regulations adopted under section 35-13-103.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 326, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-17-4.

35-13-105. Restriction of use of containers.

No person, firm, or corporation, other than the owner and those authorized by the owner to do so, shall sell, fill, refill, deliver, or permit to be delivered, or use in any manner any anhydrous ammonia storage tank, mobile transportation tank, or tank-mounted applicator for any other purpose whatsoever.

No person shall fill, refill, deliver, or permit to be delivered any anhydrous ammonia storage tank, mobile transportation tank, or tank-mounted applicator that has not been registered in compliance with the provisions of this article and rules promulgated pursuant to this article.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 326, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-17-5.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2387, § 4, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 633, § 2, effective August 5.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2003 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 360, Session Laws of Colorado 2003.

35-13-106. Effect of rules and regulations - prohibitions.

The rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article shall have uniform force and effect throughout the state, and no municipality or other political subdivision shall enact or enforce any ordinances, rules, or regulations which do not meet the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article; except that home rule cities enforcing ordinances, rules, and regulations equal to or more stringent than those prescribed under this article may continue to perform such functions.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 326, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-17-6.

35-13-107. Enforcement - investigation - access to locations and records.

The commissioner, pursuant to the provisions of the "State Administrative Procedure Act", article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., shall enforce the provisions of this article and of rules promulgated pursuant to this article or section 35-1-107 (5).

Upon the commissioner's own motion or upon the complaint of any person, the commissioner may make any investigations necessary to ensure compliance with this article.

At any time during regular business hours, upon consent or upon obtaining an administrative search warrant and for the purpose of enforcing any provision of this article or rule promulgated pursuant to this article, the commissioner shall have free and unimpeded access to:

All buildings, yards, warehouses, storage facilities, tanks, tank trailers, vehicles, and any other public or private property, premises, or carriers in which anhydrous ammonia is kept, stored, handled, distributed, or transported; and

All business records required to be kept that relate to the storage, use, transportation, or distribution of anhydrous ammonia. The commissioner may make copies of such records.

Whenever the commissioner has reasonable cause to believe a violation of any provision of this article or any rule promulgated pursuant to this article has occurred and immediate enforcement is deemed necessary, the commissioner may issue a cease-and-desist order, which may require any person to cease violating any provision of this article or any rule promulgated pursuant to this article. Such cease-and-desist order shall set forth the provisions alleged to have been violated, the facts alleged to have constituted the violation, and the requirement that all actions be ceased forthwith.

In the event that any person fails to comply with a cease-and-desist order within twenty-four hours, the commissioner may bring a suit for a temporary restraining order and injunctive relief to prevent any further or continued violation of such order.

No stay of a cease-and-desist order shall be issued before a hearing on the order involving both parties.

Matters brought before a court pursuant to this section shall have preference over other matters on the court's calendar.

The commissioner shall have full authority to administer oaths and take statements, to issue administrative subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses before the commissioner and the production of all books, memoranda, papers, and other documents, articles, or instruments, and to compel the disclosure by such witnesses of all facts known to them relative to the matters under investigation. Upon the failure or refusal of any witness to obey an administrative subpoena, the commissioner may petition the district court, and, upon a proper showing, the court may enter an order compelling the witness to appear and testify or produce documentary evidence. Failure to obey such an order of the court shall be punishable as a contempt of court.

Whenever the commissioner considers that a violation of any provision of this article or rule promulgated pursuant to this article has occurred or will occur, and that immediate and irreparable injury, loss, or damage will result if such violation is not immediately restrained or enjoined, the commissioner may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction to temporarily or permanently restrain or enjoin the act or practice in question and to enforce compliance with this article or any rule promulgated pursuant to this article. In any such action, the commissioner shall not be required to plead or prove irreparable injury or the inadequacy of the remedy at law. Under no circumstances shall the court require the commissioner to post a bond.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 326, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-17-7.

L. 2003:

IP(1) and (1)(a) amended, p. 1727, § 8, effective May 14.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 634, § 3, effective August 5.

35-13-108. Civil penalties.

The commissioner may impose a civil penalty on any person who violates any provision of this article or any rule adopted under this article or under section 35-1-107 (5). Such penalty shall not exceed seven hundred fifty dollars per day per violation.

Before imposing a civil penalty, the commissioner may consider the effect of such penalty on the ability of the violator to stay in business.

The commissioner shall not impose a civil penalty unless the person charged is given notice and an opportunity for a hearing pursuant to the "State Administrative Procedure Act", article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

If the commissioner is unable to collect, or if any person fails to pay, all or any portion of a civil penalty imposed pursuant to this section, the commissioner may recover the amount of the penalty, plus costs and attorney fees, by action in a court of competent jurisdiction.

All moneys collected pursuant to this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the inspection and consumer services cash fund created in section 35-1-106.5.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 326, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-17-8.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 1727, § 9, effective May 14.

L. 2005:

(4) amended, p. 1270, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(4) amended, p. 1904, § 6, effective July 1.

35-13-109. Registration - application - fees.

On or before the date specified by rule of the commissioner each year, every person who owns one or more anhydrous ammonia storage tanks, mobile transportation tanks, or tank-mounted applicators within this state shall register each of such tanks or applicators with the department and shall pay a registration fee as established by the agricultural commission. A registration is not transferable. No reduction of a registration fee shall be made for a fractional part of a year.

An application for registration shall state:

The name of the applicant;

If the applicant is a firm, the names of its members;

If the applicant is a corporation, the names of its officers;

The applicant's business address;

The applicant's telephone number;

The name and location of each fixed bulk facility; and

The serial number or other identifying number of each mobile transportation tank or tank-mounted applicator.

For the fiscal year commencing on July 1, 2007, and for each subsequent fiscal year, the agricultural commission shall establish a fee schedule to cover all of the direct and indirect costs of administering and enforcing the provisions of this article.

All fees, fines, and penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the inspection and consumer services cash fund created in section 35-1-106.5.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 1727, § 10, effective May 14.

L. 2005:

(4)(a) amended, p. 1270, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(3) and (4)(a) amended, p. 1904, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 635, § 4, effective August 5.

L. 2016:

(4)(b) amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 790, § 98, effective June 6.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4)(b)(II) provided for the repeal of subsection (4)(b), effective September 1, 2017. (See L. 2016, p. 790.)